Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-201
Air carrier; exempt from commission regulation.

Any person who transports passengers or property for the public in intrastate commerce by any airborne vehicle shall not be a common carrier subject to commission regulation.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. II, § 1, p. 1374;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 463;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 67.

Intrastate air carrier regulations are preempted by federal regulations. Pioneer Airways, Inc. v. City of Kearney, 199 Neb. 12, 256 N.W.2d 324 (1977).